Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 15
INTRASTATE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1987, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1987, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 REGULATED TELECOMMUNICATIONS
SERVICES

PART 3 EMERGING COMPETITIVE
TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE

PART 4 DEREGULATION

PART 5 TELECOMMUNICATIONS POLICY
AND PLANNING

PART 6 ELECTRIC UTILITY EASEMENTS